incubator/apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
  Slovakian monolingual dictionary for Apertium

  Partially based on information contained here:
  http://www.angelfire.com/sk3/quality/Slovak_declension.html

  The content of this Web site can be copied, translated and used, provided that the 
  address of this Web site is mentioned at the place, where the content is copied to, 
  translated to or used.
-->

<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáÄäBbCcČčDdĎďEeÉéFfGgHhIiÍíJjKkLlĽľĹĺMmNnŇňOoÓóÔôPpQqRrŔŕSsŠšTtŤťUuÚúVvWwXxYyÝýZzŽž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="perf"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="fut"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="ma"/>
    <sdef n="mi"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="hyd"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="voc"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="čít/ať__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ať</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aš</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ate</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajú</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alo</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ali</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ať__vbhaver">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ať</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ám</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áš</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áme</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áte</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajú</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alo</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ali</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aj</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajme</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ajte</l>
          <r>ať<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    <pardef n="rob/iť__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>iť</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ím</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íš</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íme</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íte</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ila</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilo</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ili</l>
          <r>iť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="čítať"><i>čít</i><par n="čít/ať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mať"><i>m</i><par n="m/ať__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="robiť"><i>rob</i><par n="rob/iť__vblex"/></e>
